Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.380

Filing with code reviser—Written record—Effective dates.

(1) Each agency shall file in the office of the code reviser a certified copy of all rules it adopts, except for rules contained in tariffs filed with or published by the Washington utilities and transportation commission. The code reviser shall place upon each rule a notation of the time and date of filing and shall keep a permanent written record of filed rules open to public inspection. In filing a rule, each agency shall use the standard form prescribed for this purpose by the code reviser.

(2) Emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350 become effective upon filing unless a later date is specified in the order of adoption. All other rules become effective upon the expiration of thirty days after the date of filing, unless a later date is required by statute or specified in the order of adoption.

(3) A rule may become effective immediately upon its filing with the code reviser or on any subsequent date earlier than that established by subsection (2) of this section, if the agency establishes that effective date in the adopting order and finds that:

(a) Such action is required by the state or federal Constitution, a statute, or court order;

(b) The rule only delays the effective date of another rule that is not yet effective; or

(c) The earlier effective date is necessary because of imminent peril to the public health, safety, or welfare.

The finding and a brief statement of the reasons therefor required by this subsection shall be made a part of the order adopting the rule.

(4) With respect to a rule made effective pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, each agency shall make reasonable efforts to make the effective date known to persons who may be affected by it.

[ 2007 c 456 s 5; 1989 c 175 s 11; 1988 c 288 s 315; 1987 c 505 s 17; 1980 c 87 s 11; 1959 c 234 s 4. Formerly RCW 34.04.040.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.